Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 28A.700 RCW to read as follows:A school district may allow sixth grade students in middle school to enroll in exploratory career and technical education courses, but may not include such students in career and technical education enrollment counts for purposes of calculating allocations under RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(c) or (9).Sec. 2. RCW 28A.150.265 and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 409 are each amended to read as follows:(1) To the extent that career and technical education funding allocations under RCW 28A.150.260 (4)(c) and (9) exceed general education funding allocations under RCW 28A.150.260, school districts may use the difference only for the career and technical education purposes, defined as follows:(a) Staff salaries and benefits for career and technical education program delivery;(b) Materials, supplies, and operating costs;(c) Smaller class sizes;(d) Work-based learning programs such as internships and preapprenticeship programs, including coordination tied to career and technical education coursework;(e) New high quality career and technical education and expanded learning program development in high-demand fields;(f) Certificated work-based learning coordinators and career guidance advisors;(g) School expenses associated with career and technical education community partnerships with a career discovery focus including research or evidence-based mentoring programs and expanded learning opportunities in school, before or after school, and during the summer, and career-focused education programs with private and public K-12 schools and colleges, community-based organizations and nonprofit organizations, industry partners, tribal governments, and workforce development entities;(h) Student fees for national and state industry-recognized certifications; and(i) Course equivalency development to integrate core learning standards into career and technical education courses.(2) A school district's maximum allowable indirect cost charges for approved career and technical education programs funded by the state may not exceed the lower of five percent or the cap established in federal law for federal career and technical education funding provided to school districts, as the federal law existed on September 1, 2017.(3) The middle school and high school career and technical education programs funded through RCW 28A.150.260(4)(c) must be treated as a single program when accounting for and calculating minimum expenditures, carryover amounts, and recovery amounts. This treatment is exclusively for accounting purposes and must not result in disparate program quality across grade levels.--- END ---